Alabama, session 2026rs, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-43-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-43-12
(a) No alderman or officer or employee of the
municipality shall be have, directly or indirectly,
interesteda financial interest in any work, business, or
contract, the expense, price, or consideration of which is
paid from the treasury, nor shall any member of the council or
officer of the municipality be surety for any person having a
contract, work, or business with such the municipality for the
performance of which a surety may be required.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a first responder
employed by the municipality, if otherwise qualified, is not
prohibited from accepting or receiving funds from a community
Page 1

prohibited from accepting or receiving funds from a community
HB273 Engrossed
development block grant where the funds flow through the
municipal treasury, provided:
(1) The benefit to the first responder is similar and
in a like manner to other recipients of the grant program; and
(2) The first responder does not play any
decision-making role in eligibility for receiving funds from
the grant program.
(c) The exception in subsection (b) is not available to
any public official, as defined in Section 36-25-1, or any
family member of the public official, as defined in Section
36-25-1.
(b)(d) Any person individual who violates any of the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than
$50.00 fifty dollars ($50) nor more than $1,000.00one thousand
dollars ($1,000), and may also be sentenced to hard labor for
the county for not more than six months."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB273 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................15-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on County and Municipal
Government

Read for the second time and placed ................21-Jan-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................5-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 83
Nays 15
Abs 7


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3